Nebraska, session 109, LB410.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB410 LB410
2025 2025
Section 1. (1) Notwithstanding section 44-3,131, (a) any individual
or group sickness and accident insurance policy, certificate, or
subscriber contract delivered, issued for delivery, or renewed in this
state and any hospital, medical, or surgical expense-incurred policy,
except for short-term major medical policies of six months or less
duration and policies that provide coverage for a specified disease or
other limited-benefit coverage, and (b) any self-funded employee benefit
plan, to the extent not preempted by federal law, shall include coverage
for prosthetics and orthotics that, at a minimum, equals the coverage
provided under the federal medicare program pursuant to 42 U.S.C. 1395k,
1395l, and 1395m and 42 C.F.R. 410.100, 414.202, 414.210, and 414.228, as
such sections and regulations existed on January 1, 2024. Such coverage
may be limited to the most appropriate prosthetic or orthotic that is
deemed medically necessary by the covered individual's treating
physician, including repair or replacement of prosthetics and orthotics
if repair or replacement is determined appropriate by the treating
physician. If coverage under this section is provided through an
insurance policy or expense-incurred policy, such policy may require that
prosthetics and orthotics be furnished by a prosthetist with which the
insurer has a contract, but the covered individual shall have access to
medically necessary clinical care, prosthetic and orthotic services, and
prosthetic and orthotic components or technology from a nonparticipating
prosthetist to the same extent that the policy provides for out-of-
network services for other covered benefits.
(2) This section does not prevent application of deductible or
copayment provisions contained in the policy, certificate, contract, or
employee benefit plan or require that such coverage be extended to any
other procedures. The policy, certificate, contract, or employee benefit
plan shall not impose any annual or lifetime dollar maximum on coverage
for prosthetics and orthotics other than an annual or lifetime dollar
maximum that applies in the aggregate to all other terms and services
-2-

LB410 LB410
2025 2025
covered.
(3) For purposes of this section, (a) orthotic means a custom-fitted
or custom-fabricated medical device that is applied to a part of the
human body to correct a deformity, improve function, or relieve symptoms
of a disease and (b) prosthetic means artificial legs and arms and
associated components, including replacements if required, as a result of
a change in the patient's physical condition.
-3-